California statutes. Education Code
(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that no fee or other cost be charged to any pupil pursuant to this article. However, notwithstanding any other provision of law, a school district receiving funds pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 54000) of Part 29 may expend any portion of those funds to pay for all or part of the costs of one or more examinations pursuant to this article that are charged to economically disadvantaged pupils.

(b) An economically disadvantaged pupil means a pupil from a family that receives Aid to Families with Dependent Children.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 204, Sec. 13.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. State Seal of Biliteracy [51460. - 51464.]

51460.

(a) The State Seal of Biliteracy is established to recognize high school graduates who have attained a high level of proficiency in speaking, reading, and writing in one or more languages in addition to English. The State Seal of Biliteracy shall be awarded by the Superintendent. School district participation in this program is voluntary.

(b) The purposes of the State Seal of Biliteracy are as follows:

(1) To encourage pupils to study languages.

(2) To certify attainment of biliteracy.

(3) To provide employers with a method of identifying people with language and biliteracy
 skills.

(4) To provide universities with a method to recognize and give academic credit to applicants seeking admission.

(5) To prepare pupils with 21st century skills.

(6) To recognize and promote world language instruction in public schools.

(7) To strengthen intergroup relationships, affirm the value of diversity, and honor the multiple cultures and languages of a community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 22.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

51461.

(a) The State Seal of Biliteracy certifies attainment of a high level of proficiency by a graduating high school pupil in one or more languages, in addition to English, and certifies that the graduate meets the following criteria for being proficient in English and one or more languages other than English:

(1) Proficiency in English shall be demonstrated through one of the following requirements:

(A) Completion of all English language arts requirements for graduation with an overall grade point average of 3.0 or above in those classes. Completion of one or more English language arts courses at a public higher education institution
 or an independent institution of higher education, as described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 66010, with a grade equivalent to a grade point average of 3.0 or above may also be used to satisfy one or more course requirements of this subparagraph.

(B) Passing the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress for English language arts, or any successor test, administered in grade 11, at or above level 3, or at the achievement level determined by the Superintendent for any successor test.

(C) (i) Passing an English Advanced Placement examination with a score of 3 or higher or an English International Baccalaureate examination with a score of 4 or higher.

(ii) For purposes of
 clause (i), “English Advanced Placement” means Advanced Placement English Language and Composition, Advanced Placement English Literature and Composition, or Advanced Placement Seminar.

(D) Achieving a score of 480 or higher on the Evidence-Based Reading and Writing section of the SAT.

(2) Proficiency in one or more languages other than English shall be demonstrated through one of the following requirements:

(A) Passing a world language Advanced Placement examination with a score of 3 or higher, passing a world language International Baccalaureate examination with a score of 4 or higher, passing a world language ACTFL Writing Proficiency Test (WPT) and an Oral Proficiency Interview (OPI) with scores of Intermediate Mid or
 higher, or, beginning with the 2024–25 school year, achieving at a level 3 on the high school California Spanish Assessment (CSA).

(B) Successful completion of a four-year course of study of content in a world language at a high school or higher level attaining an overall grade point average of 3.0 or above in that course of study, and oral proficiency in the language comparable to that required pursuant to subparagraph (A). Pupils may also satisfy the requirements of this subparagraph by either or both of the following:

(i) Successful completion of high school level courses completed in another country in a language other than English with the equivalent of an overall grade point average of 3.0 or above, as verified through a transcript.

(ii) Completion of one or more world language courses at a public higher education institution or an independent institution of higher education, as described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 66010, with a grade equivalent to a grade point average of 3.0 or above and oral proficiency in the language comparable to that required pursuant to subparagraph (A), as verified through a transcript.

(C) (i) If no Advanced Placement examination or off-the-shelf language test exists and the school district can certify to the Superintendent that the test meets the rigor of a four-year high school course of study in that world language, passing a school district language examination that, at a minimum, assesses speaking, reading, and writing in a language other than English at the proficient level or higher. If a
 school district offers a language examination in a language in which an Advanced Placement examination or off-the-shelf language test exists, the school district language examination shall be approved by the Superintendent for the purpose of determining proficiency in a language other than English.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), a pupil who seeks to qualify for the State Seal of Biliteracy through a language that is not characterized by listening, speaking, or reading, or for which there is no written system, shall pass an assessment on the modalities that characterize communication in that language at the proficient level or higher.

(b) If a pupil in any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, is an English learner, the pupil shall meet both of the following criteria in order to
 qualify for the State Seal of Biliteracy:

(1) Attain an Oral Language composite score of level 4 on the English Language Proficiency Assessments for California, or any successor English oral language proficiency assessment, in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(2) Demonstrate proficiency in English through one of the accomplishments listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and demonstrate proficiency in one or more languages other than English through one of the accomplishments listed in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) For languages in which an Advanced Placement test is not available, the Superintendent may provide a listing of equivalent summative tests that school
 districts may use in place of an Advanced Placement test for purposes of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). A school district may provide the Superintendent with a list of equivalent summative tests that the school district uses in place of an Advanced Placement test for purposes of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The Superintendent may use lists received from school districts in developing the Superintendent’s list of equivalent summative tests.

(d) For purposes of this article, “world language” has the same meaning as defined in Section 91.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for those pupils on track to graduate in 2022 and who were unable to take the assessment identified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the
 Superintendent may use the assessments identified in Section 121 of Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021 to determine whether a pupil obtained the achievement level on a grade 11 English language arts assessment for the purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 608, Sec. 8.   (AB 2467)   Effective September 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

51462.

The Superintendent shall do both of the following:

(a) Prepare and deliver to participating school districts an appropriate insignia to be affixed to the diploma or transcript of the pupil indicating that the pupil has been awarded a State Seal of Biliteracy by the Superintendent.

(b) Provide other information it deems necessary for school districts to successfully participate in the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 618, Sec. 2.   (AB 815)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

51463.

A school district that participates in the program under this article shall do both of the following:

(a) Maintain appropriate records in order to identify pupils who have earned a State Seal of Biliteracy.

(b) Affix the appropriate insignia to the diploma or transcript of each pupil who earns a State Seal of Biliteracy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 618, Sec. 2.   (AB 815)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

51464.

It is the intent of the Legislature that no fee be charged to a pupil pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 618, Sec. 2.   (AB 815)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. State Seal of Civic Engagement [51470. - 51475.]

51470.

It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a State Seal of Civic Engagement to encourage, and create pathways for, pupils in elementary and secondary schools to become civically engaged in democratic governmental institutions at the local, state, and national levels.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 604, Sec. 1.   (AB 24)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

51471.

(a) On or before January 1, 2020, the Superintendent shall recommend to the state board criteria for awarding a State Seal of Civic Engagement to pupils who have demonstrated excellence in civics education and participation and have demonstrated an understanding of the United States Constitution, the California Constitution, and the democratic system of government. In developing criteria for the State Seal of Civic Engagement, the Superintendent shall incorporate the Six Proven Practices for Effective Civic Learning, developed by the Education Commission of the States, and any and all other best practices for civic learning and engagement. In developing criteria for the State Seal of Civic Engagement, the Superintendent shall also consult with
 a diverse group of credentialed, current, classroom teachers who teach the subject of history-social science, including government, in secondary schools. The Superintendent shall also consider including criteria based on each of the following:

(1) Successful completion of history, government, and civics courses, including courses that incorporate character education.

(2) Voluntary participation in community service or extracurricular activities.

(3) Any other related requirements as it deems appropriate.

(b) In developing criteria pursuant to subdivision (a), the Superintendent shall ensure, to the greatest extent feasible, that the criteria:

(1) Provide all pupils with an opportunity to earn the State Seal of Civic Engagement.

(2) Recognize pupil excellence or outstanding achievement.

(3) Are not based primarily on pupil achievement that is already recognized through grades or other standard measures of pupil achievement.

(4) To the extent possible, result in a seal that confers some benefit to pupils beyond secondary school.

(c) On or before January 31, 2021, the state board shall adopt, reject, or modify the criteria recommended by the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) When
 the state board next revises the criteria for the State Seal of Civic Engagement, the Superintendent shall recommend revised criteria to the state board for awarding the State Seal of Civic Engagement, requiring, along with meeting all other eligibility criteria for the award, a demonstrated understanding of the importance of preserving democracy and its vital institutions, including, but not limited to, the free press, free access to libraries, compulsory education, and the federalist system. The Superintendent shall limit recommendations to content that is not already included in the criteria established pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) School district participation in this program is voluntary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 692, Sec. 1.   (AB 422)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

51472.

The Superintendent shall do both of the following:

(a) Prepare and deliver to participating school districts an appropriate insignia to be affixed to the diploma or transcript of the pupil indicating that the pupil has been awarded a State Seal of Civic Engagement by the Superintendent.

(b) Provide other information he or she deems necessary for school districts to successfully participate in the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 604, Sec. 1.   (AB 24)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

51473.

A school district that participates in the program under this article shall do both of the following:

(a) Maintain appropriate records in order to identify pupils who have earned a State Seal of Civic Engagement.

(b) Affix the appropriate insignia to the diploma or transcript of each pupil who earns a State Seal of Civic Engagement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 604, Sec. 1.   (AB 24)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

51474.

No fee shall be charged to a pupil to receive a State Seal of Civic Engagement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 604, Sec. 1.   (AB 24)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

51475.

(a) The California Serves Program is hereby established under the administration of the department, in collaboration with CaliforniaVolunteers, for purposes of promoting access to effective service learning for pupils in grade 12 who are enrolled at participating local educational agencies, with the goal of expanding access for high school graduates in obtaining a State Seal of Civic Engagement through service learning.

(b) The department, in partnership with CaliforniaVolunteers, shall do all of the following:

(1) Review the available evidence on ways to incorporate effective service learning for pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, and, on or before January 1, 2024, provide
 recommendations to the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code and consistent with the recommended criteria and implementation guidance for the State Seal of Civic Engagement pursuant to this article, on evidence-based strategies to expand access to high-quality service learning programs in California high schools and promote equitable access to these programs.

(2) On or before January 1, 2024, develop and post on the department’s and CaliforniaVolunteers’ internet websites evidence-based strategies for expanding access to high-quality service learning programs that may be used by teachers and local educational agencies.

(3) Develop model uniform metrics, based on the recommended criteria for the State Seal of Civic Engagement, for the measurement of pupil progress toward academic, civic engagement, and other learning objectives. Civic learning objectives
 shall include the final goal of awarding of the State Seal of Civic Engagement pursuant to this article.

(4) Use the evidence, recommendations, and metrics identified pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, in the administration of the California Serves Program.

(c) (1) Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year, the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) is hereby appropriated, each fiscal year, from the General Fund to the department for annual awards to local educational agencies for California Serves Program grants pursuant to this section.

(2) The department, in collaboration with CaliforniaVolunteers, shall establish the California Serves Program grant program, develop criteria for the awarding of grants and an application process, request necessary data from participating local
 educational agencies, and award grants consistent with this section.

(d) In order for a local educational agency to be eligible for a grant under this section, at least 55 percent of the pupils enrolled in the applicant local educational agency shall be unduplicated pupils as defined in Section 2574 or 42238.02, as applicable.

(e) Eligible local educational agencies who receive grants pursuant to this grant program shall receive an amount of up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) annually.

(f) Allowable uses for funding allocated pursuant to this grant program include all of the following:

(1) Paid planning time for teachers to increase the use of service learning in their instruction.

(2) Professional development for school and local educational agency administrators and classroom teachers on service learning.

(3) Purchase of instructional materials to aid in the use of service learning in instruction.

(4) Participation costs of pupils and school personnel, including any materials or travel expenses related to service learning activities.

(5) Personnel costs for coordination of service learning at a local educational agency or a schoolsite of a local educational agency.

(6) Participation costs associated with grant program evaluation.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before November 5, 2024, and annually thereafter, the
 department, in partnership with CaliforniaVolunteers, shall submit a report on the program to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code. The report shall include an evaluation of the program using the model uniform metrics established by the department in partnership with CaliforniaVolunteers pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) The number of participating pupils, schools, and local educational agencies, and the grant awards for each grantee.

(2) The demographics of pupils engaged in service learning as a result of the grant.

(3) The impact of the service performed by pupils and school staff as a result of the grant.

(4) Pupil outcomes in the academic, civic engagement, and other learning objectives measured by the model uniform metrics identified by the department in partnership with CaliforniaVolunteers pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), including, but not limited to, obtaining the State Seal of Civic Engagement.

(h) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “CaliforniaVolunteers” means CaliforniaVolunteers as established by Executive Order No. S-24-06.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(3) “Program” means the California Serves Program established pursuant to subdivision (a).

(4) “Service learning” means an educational approach that intentionally combines meaningful community service activities with instruction and reflection to support pupil progress toward academic and civic engagement learning objectives while meeting societal needs.

(i) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made by subdivision (c) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the appropriation is made, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the
 appropriation is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 71.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Prohibited Instruction [51500. - 51540.]



  ARTICLE 1. Prejudices [51500. - 51501.]

51500.

(a) (1) A teacher shall not give instruction and a school district shall not sponsor any activity that promotes a discriminatory bias on the basis of race or ethnicity, gender, religion, disability, nationality, or sexual orientation, or pursuant to a characteristic listed in Section
 220.

(2) Discriminatory bias in instruction and school-sponsored activities does not require a showing of direct harm to members of a protected group. Members of a protected group do not need to be present while the discriminatory bias is occurring for the act to be considered discriminatory bias.

(3) If the governing board or body of a local educational agency finds that instruction or school-sponsored activities are discriminatory pursuant to
 this section, corrective action shall be taken.

(b) Teacher instruction shall be factually accurate and align with the adopted curriculum and standards as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 60200, and be consistent with accepted standards of professional responsibility, rather than advocacy, personal opinion, bias, or partisanship.

(c) Local educational agencies shall ensure that parents and guardians have access to materials in a reasonable amount of time pursuant to Section 49091.10 and the California Public Records Act, as set forth in Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(d) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 428, Sec. 7.   (AB 715)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

51501.

(a) The state board and any governing board shall not adopt any textbooks or other instructional materials for use in the public schools that contain any matter reflecting adversely upon persons on the basis of race or ethnicity, gender, religion, disability, nationality, or sexual orientation, or because of a characteristic listed in Section 220, or that violates Section 243, 244, 51500, or 60044.

(b) Instructional materials, including, but not limited to, materials adopted by the state
 board or any governing body, shall be factually accurate and reflect the adopted curriculum and standards as described in subdivision (c) of Section 60200, and be consistent with accepted standards of professional responsibility, rather than advocacy, personal opinion, bias, or partisanship.

(c) A governing board shall not prohibit the continued use of an appropriately adopted textbook, instructional material, or curriculum on the basis that it contains inclusive and diverse perspectives, including those in compliance with Sections 51204.5, 51933, 51934, and 60040.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 428, Sec. 8.   (AB 715)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Prohibited Materials [51510. - 51514.]

51510.

Except as to textbooks approved by the state board or a county board of education, no bulletin, circular, or publication may be used as the basis of study or recitation or to supplement the regular school studies if the material contained in the bulletin, circular, or publication has been disapproved by the governing board of the school district in which the school is situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51511.

Nothing in this code shall be construed to prevent, or exclude from the public schools, references to religion or references to or the use of religious literature, dance, music, theatre, and visual arts or other things having a religious significance when such references or uses do not constitute instruction in religious principles or aid to any religious sect, church, creed, or sectarian purpose and when such references or uses are incidental to or illustrative of matters properly included in the course of study.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 734, Sec. 33.   Effective October 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

51512.

The Legislature finds that the use by any person, including a pupil, of any electronic listening or recording device in any classroom of the elementary and secondary schools without the prior consent of the teacher and the principal of the school given to promote an educational purpose disrupts and impairs the teaching process and discipline in the elementary and secondary schools, and such use is prohibited. Any person, other than a pupil, who willfully violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any pupil violating this section shall be subject to appropriate disciplinary action.

This section shall not be construed as affecting the powers, rights, and liabilities arising from the use of electronic listening or recording devices as provided for by any other provision of law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51513.

No test, questionnaire, survey, or examination containing any questions about the pupil’s personal beliefs or practices in sex, family life, morality, and religion, or any questions about the pupil’s parents’ or guardians’ beliefs and practices in sex, family life, morality, and religion, shall be administered to any pupil in kindergarten or grades 1 to 12, inclusive, unless the parent or guardian of the pupil is notified in writing that this test, questionnaire, survey, or examination is to be administered and the parent or guardian of the pupil gives written permission for the pupil to take this test, questionnaire, survey, or examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 275, Sec. 4.   Effective August 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

51514.

If a local educational agency administers a voluntary survey that already includes questions pertaining to sexual orientation and gender identity, the local educational agency shall not remove those questions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 744, Sec. 2.   (AB 677)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Solicitations [51520. - 51521.]

51520.

(a) During school hours, and within one hour before the time of opening and within one hour after the time of closing of school, pupils of the public school shall not be solicited on school premises by teachers or others to subscribe or contribute to the funds of, to become members of, or to work for, any organization not directly under the control of the school authorities, unless the organization is a nonpartisan, charitable organization organized for charitable purposes by an act of Congress or under the laws of the state, the purpose of the solicitation is nonpartisan and charitable, and the solicitation has been approved by the county board of education or by the governing board of the school district in which the school is located.

(b) A licensed dentist who provides voluntary dental health screening programs for pupils on school premises, shall not solicit a pupil, or the pupil’s parent or guardian, or encourage, or advise treatment or consultation for the pupil by the licensed dentist, or any entity in which the licensed dentist has a financial interest, for any condition discovered in the course of the dental health screening. It is the intent of the Legislature that no licensed dentist use voluntary dental health screening programs for the generation of referrals or for financial benefit. The Legislature does not intend to deny or limit freedom of choice in the selection of an appropriate dental provider for treatment or consultation.

(c) A licensed optometrist who provides voluntary vision testing programs for pupils on school premises, shall not solicit a pupil, or the pupil’s parent or guardian, or encourage, or advise treatment or consultation for the pupil by the licensed optometrist, or any entity in which the licensed optometrist has a financial interest, for any condition discovered in the course of the vision testing. It is the intent of the Legislature that no licensed optometrist use voluntary vision testing programs for the generation of referrals or for financial benefit. The Legislature does not intend to deny freedom of choice in the selection of an appropriate vision care provider for treatment or consultation.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the solicitation of pupils of the public school on school premises by pupils of that school for any otherwise lawful purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 83, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

51521.

No person shall solicit any other person to contribute to any fund or to purchase any item of personal property, upon the representation that the money received is to be used wholly or in part for the benefit of any public school or the student body of any public school, unless such person obtains the prior written approval of either the governing board of the school district in which such solicitation is to be made or the governing board of the school district having jurisdiction over the school or student body represented to be benefited by such solicitation, or the designee of either of such boards.

The prohibitions of this section shall not apply with respect to any solicitation or contribution the total proceeds of which are delivered to a public school, nor to a solicitation of a transfer to be effected by a testamentary act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Advocacy or Teaching of Communism [51530. - 51530.]

51530.

No teacher giving instruction in any school, or on any property belonging to any agencies included in the public school system, shall advocate or teach communism with the intent to indoctrinate or to inculcate in the mind of any pupil a preference for communism.

In prohibiting the advocacy or teaching of communism with the intent of indoctrinating or inculcating a preference in the mind of any pupil for such doctrine, the Legislature does not intend to prevent the teaching of the facts about communism. Rather, the Legislature intends to prevent the advocacy of, or inculcation and indoctrination into, communism as is hereinafter defined, for the purpose of undermining patriotism for, and the belief in, the government of the United States and of this state.

For the purposes of this section, communism is a political theory that the presently existing form of government of the United States or of this state should be changed, by force, violence, or other unconstitutional means, to a totalitarian dictatorship which is based on the principles of communism as expounded by Marx, Lenin, and Stalin.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Humane Treatment of Animals [51540. - 51540.]

51540.

In the public elementary and high schools or in public elementary and high school school-sponsored activities and classes held elsewhere than on school premises, live vertebrate animals shall not, as part of a scientific experiment or any purpose whatever:

(a) Be experimentally medicated or drugged in a manner to cause painful reactions or induce painful or lethal pathological conditions.

(b) Be injured through any other treatments, including, but not limited to, anesthetization or electric shock.

Live animals on the premises of a public elementary or high school shall be housed and cared for in a humane and safe manner.

The provisions of this section are not intended to prohibit or constrain vocational instruction in the normal practices of animal husbandry.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Authorized Classes and Courses of Instruction [51705. - 51879.9.]



  ARTICLE 1.5. The Online Classroom Pilot Program [51705. - 51705.]

51705.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Asynchronous interactive instructional program” means a program in which a pupil and teacher interact using online resources, including, but not limited to, discussion boards, Web sites, and e-mail. However, the pupil and teacher need not necessarily be online at the same time.

(b) “Internet” means the global information system that is logically linked together by a globally unique address space based on the Internet Protocol (IP), or its subsequent extensions, and that is able to support communications using the Transmission Control Protocol/Internet Protocol (TCP/IP) suite, or provides, uses, or makes accessible, either publicly or privately, high-level services layered on the communications and related infrastructure described in this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 429, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Mathematics Readiness Challenge [51710. - 51710.]

51710.

(a) The Mathematics Readiness Challenge program is hereby established.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the program support the implementation and evaluation of grade 12 experiences that are designed to prepare pupils for placement into college-level courses in mathematics.

(c) Funds appropriated in Item 6100-195-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2016 shall be available for purposes of this article.

(d) (1) The program shall be administered by the department, and shall adhere to the minimum criteria, standards, and requirements that
 are applicable pursuant to Part A (commencing with Section 201) of Title II of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (Public Law 107-110).

(2) The department shall make awards to eligible partnerships selected by a committee consisting of three representatives, with one from each of the following:

(A) The department.

(B) The California State University.

(C) The California Mathematics Project established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 99200) of Chapter 5 of Part 65 of Division 14 of Title 3.

(3) The committee shall consult with the president of the state board or his or her designee before selecting eligible partnerships pursuant to this article.

(e) A grant made pursuant to this article shall only be made to an eligible partnership that includes participation by each of the following entities:

(1) At least one division of a postsecondary educational institution that prepares teachers and principals.

(2) At least one school of arts and sciences of a postsecondary educational institution.

(3) At least one high-need local educational agency.

(f) The department shall award grants of one million two hundred eighty thousand dollars ($1,280,000) each to five eligible partnerships selected by the committee.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that all of the following
 occur:

(1) These funds support different kinds of grade 12 experiences to allow for the evaluation of the effectiveness of various experiences.

(2) The grade 12 experiences focus on the needs of pupils who have completed three years of college-preparatory mathematics courses but are not expected to be deemed ready for college-level mathematics courses upon matriculation to a postsecondary educational institution.

(3) The grade 12 experiences be implemented by no later than the 2017–18 school year.

(h) The committee shall select eligible partnerships such that each eligible partnership that receives a grant would implement a grade 12 experience sufficiently different from those that would be implemented by other eligible partnerships that receive awards.
 The committee shall give preference to partnerships that include local educational agencies whose high school graduates have high mathematics remediation rates based on California State University freshmen enrollment data.

(i) Grants awarded pursuant to this article shall be used for professional development for teachers, paraprofessionals, and principals for purposes of this article and for the development and provision of assistance necessary for the professional development of those individuals, consistent with federal law.

(j) As a condition of receiving a grant award, eligible partnerships shall commit to both of the following:

(1) Making any new course materials, including curriculum, widely available or available as open educational resources.

(2) Sharing information about their policies and practices and evidence regarding the effectiveness of those policies and practices in preparing pupils for college-level courses in mathematics with other entities within their regions and across the state.

(k) On or before November 30, 2018, the Trustees of the California State University shall report to the Director of Finance and the Legislature, in conformance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, any policy changes made based on evidence collected through the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 29, Sec. 21.   (SB 828)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Evening High School for Minors [51720. - 51724.]

51720.

The governing board of a school district which maintains high schools and a continuation education program may establish and maintain evening high school programs in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, for minors subject to Section 48200.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51721.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a governing board to which this article applies may establish the number of, and the specific days of the week on which such a program shall be in session. The governing board may further prescribe the number of hours during which the program shall be in session.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51722.

An evening high school program shall consist of courses similar to the curriculum of the regular high schools of the district.

Credit for coursework satisfactorily completed shall be acceptable by all of the regular day high schools of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51723.

The attendance of a minor at an evening high school program shall be voluntary, but the written permission of the minor’s parent or guardian is required.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51724.

The attendance of a pupil in an evening high school program shall not result in the crediting of more than one unit of average daily attendance during the regular school year, even if the pupil also attends one or more classes in the regular high schools of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Elementary School Special Day and Evening Classes [51730. - 51732.]

51730.

The governing body of any elementary school district may establish and maintain, in connection with any school under its jurisdiction, special day and evening classes and summer schools, consisting of special day classes or special evening classes or both, for the purpose of giving instruction in any of the branches of study prescribed and authorized for the elementary schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51731.
